Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1753, § 1, effective November 1, 1982, designated §§13-8-1 through13-8-4 as Article 1 of this chapter.

13-8-1.
Contracts to do immoral or illegal things.

A contract to do an immoral or illegal thing is void. If the contract is severable, however, the part of the contract which is legal will not be invalidated by the part of the contract which is illegal.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2713; Code 1868, § 2707; Code 1873, § 2749; Code 1882, § 2749; Civil Code 1895, § 3666; Civil Code 1910, § 4251; Code 1933, § 20-501.

Section may be inapplicable when illegality is collateral or remotely connected with contract. —

This rule has been held inapplicable where object of contract is not illegal or against public policy, but when illegality is only collateral or remotely connected with contract. Shannondoah, Inc. v. Smith, 140 Ga. App. 200, 230 S.E.2d 351, 1976 Ga. App. LEXIS 1406 (1976).

13-8-2.
Contracts contravening public policy generally.

A contract that is against the policy of the law cannot be enforced. Contracts deemed contrary to public policy include but are not limited to:

Contracts tending to corrupt legislation or the judiciary;

Contracts in general restraint of trade, as distinguished from contracts which restrict certain competitive activities, as provided in Article 4 of this chapter;

Contracts to evade or oppose the revenue laws of another country;

Wagering contracts; or

Contracts of maintenance or champerty.

A covenant, promise, agreement, or understanding in or in connection with or collateral to a contract or agreement relative to the construction, alteration, repair, or maintenance of a building structure, appurtenances, and appliances, including moving, demolition, and excavating connected therewith, purporting to require that one party to such contract or agreement shall indemnify, hold harmless, insure, or defend the other party to the contract or other named indemnitee, including its, his, or her officers, agents, or employees, against liability or claims for damages, losses, or expenses, including attorney fees, arising out of bodily injury to persons, death, or damage to property caused by or resulting from the sole negligence of the indemnitee, or its, his, or her officers, agents, or employees, is against public policy and void and unenforceable. This subsection shall not affect any obligation under workers’ compensation or coverage or insurance specifically relating to workers’ compensation, nor shall this subsection apply to any requirement that one party to the contract purchase a project specific insurance policy, including an owner’s or contractor’s protective insurance, builder’s risk insurance, installation coverage, project management protective liability insurance, an owner controlled insurance policy, or a contractor controlled insurance policy.

A covenant, promise, agreement, or understanding in or in connection with or collateral to a contract or agreement for engineering, architectural, or land surveying services purporting to require that one party to such contract or agreement shall indemnify, hold harmless, insure, or defend the other party to the contract or other named indemnitee, including its, his, or her officers, agents, or employees, against liability or claims for damages, losses, or expenses, including attorney fees, is against public policy and void and unenforceable, except for indemnification for damages, losses, or expenses to the extent caused by or resulting from the negligence, recklessness, or intentionally wrongful conduct of the indemnitor or other persons employed or utilized by the indemnitor in the performance of the contract. This subsection shall not affect any obligation under workers’ compensation or coverage or insurance specifically relating to workers’ compensation, nor shall this subsection apply to any requirement that one party to the contract purchase a project specific insurance policy or project specific policy endorsement.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2714; Code 1868, § 2708; Code 1873, § 2750; Code 1882, § 2750; Civil Code 1895, § 3668; Civil Code 1910, § 4253; Code 1933, § 20-504; Ga. L. 1970, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 13; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 13; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1676, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 208, § 1/HB 136; Ga. L. 2009, p. 231, § 1/HB 173; Ga. L. 2011, p. 399, § 2/HB 30; Ga. L. 2016, p. 205, § 1/HB 943.

The 2009 amendment,

in subsection (a), substituted “that” for “which” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph and, at the end of paragraph (a)(2), substituted “which restrict certain competitive activities, as provided in Article 4 of this chapter” for “in partial restraint of trade as provided for in Code Section 13-8-2.1”.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 11, 2011, in subsection (a),
substituted “that” for “which” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1) and substituted “contracts which restrict certain competitive activities, as provided in Article 4 of this chapter” for “contracts in partial restraint of trade as provided for in Code Section 13-8-2.1” in paragraph (a)(2). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added subsection (c).

Partial Restraints of Trade

Partial restraints of trade are not void under O.C.G.A. § 13-8-2. —

This provision merely declares existing common law prohibiting general restraints of trade, and partial restraints, as heretofore recognized, are not void. Watkins v. Avnet, Inc., 122 Ga. App. 474, 177 S.E.2d 582, 1970 Ga. App. LEXIS 911 (1970).

Contract in partial restraint may be upheld

provided restraint is reasonable and contract is valid in other essentials. Britt v. Davis, 239 Ga. 747, 238 S.E.2d 881, 1977 Ga. LEXIS 1319 (1977).

Contracts in partial restraint of trade are not void as against public policy,

provided those contracts are reasonable. Hood v. Legg, 160 Ga. 620, 128 S.E. 891, 1925 Ga. LEXIS 219 (1925).

13-8-2.1.
Contracts in partial restraint of trade.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 399, § 3/HB 30, effective May 11, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §13-8-2.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1676, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 13; Ga. L. 2009, p. 231, § 2/HB 173.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 399, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “During the 2009 legislative session the General Assembly enacted HB 173 (Act No. 64, Ga. L. 2009, p. 231), which was a bill that dealt with the issue of restrictive covenants in contracts and which was contingently effective on the passage of a constitutional amendment. During the 2010 legislative session the General Assembly enacted HR 178 (Ga. L. 2010, p. 1260), the constitutional amendment necessary for the statutory language of HB 173 (Act No. 64, Ga. L. 2009, p. 231), and the voters ratified the constitutional amendment on November 2, 2010. It has been suggested by certain parties that because of the effective date provisions of HB 173 (Act No. 64, Ga. L. 2009, p. 231), there may be some question about the validity of that legislation. It is the intention of this Act to remove any such uncertainty by substantially reenacting the substantive provisions of HB 173 (Act No. 64, Ga. L. 2009, p. 231), but the enactment of this Act should not be taken as evidence of a legislative determination that HB 173 (Act No. 64, Ga. L. 2009, p. 231) was in fact invalid.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 399, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the repeal of this Code section shall apply to contracts entered into on and after May 11, 2011, and shall not apply in actions determining the enforceability of restrictive covenants entered into before May 11, 2011.

13-8-3.
Gambling contracts.

Gambling contracts are void; and all evidences of debt, except negotiable instruments in the hands of holders in due course or encumbrances or liens on property, executed upon a gambling consideration, are void in the hands of any person.

Money paid or property delivered upon a gambling consideration may be recovered from the winner by the loser by institution of an action for the same within six months after the loss and, after the expiration of that time, by institution of an action by any person, at any time within four years, for the joint use of himself and the educational fund of the county.

History.
Laws 1764, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 725; Laws 1765, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 727; Code 1863, § 2717; Code 1868, § 2711; Code 1873, § 2753; Code 1882, § 2753; Civil Code 1895, § 3671; Civil Code 1910, § 4256; Ga. L. 1924, p. 126, § 57; Code 1933, § 20-505.

Section inapplicable to money deposited in slot machines. —

Maintenance and operation of a slot machine, where persons playing the slot machine may, by chance, obtain money or articles of value worth more than money deposited in the machine, is a lottery or transaction in the nature of a lottery, and the law providing for recovery back of consideration paid under gaming contracts, is not applicable thereto. Thompson v. Ledbetter, 74 Ga. App. 427, 39 S.E.2d 720, 1946 Ga. App. LEXIS 557 (1946).

The law does not apply to a slot machine. What is generally known as a slot machine is a lottery and is not playing or betting at any game whatever, and this statute has reference to recovery of money or property paid or delivered upon account of losses by playing or betting at a game. Moore v. Atlanta Athletic Club, 79 Ga. App. 41, 52 S.E.2d 628, 1949 Ga. App. LEXIS 582 (1949) (see O.C.G.A. §13-8-3).

Contracts known as options are not to be classed as gambling contracts

under laws of Georgia, nor are the contracts otherwise condemned as unlawful for any reason. Martin v. Citizens' Bank, 177 Ga. 871, 171 S.E. 711, 1933 Ga. LEXIS 453 (1933).

13-8-4.
Liability of stakeholder of money risked on wager.

A stakeholder of money risked on a wager shall be obligated to repay the money to the party depositing it, upon demand, before it is actually paid to the winner; but if he pays the money to the winner bona fide, and without notice of the depositor’s intention to retract, he shall not be liable for such payment.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2809; Code 1868, § 2817; Code 1873, § 2868; Code 1882, § 2868; Civil Code 1895, § 3721; Civil Code 1910, § 4315; Code 1933, § 20-1005.